Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2358, as
last amended by Section 155, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 2358), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2358. For all tax years beginning after December 31,
1981, taxable income and adjusted gross income shall be adjusted to
arrive at Oklahoma taxable income and Oklahoma adjusted gross income
as required by this section.


HB1200 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

A. The taxable income of any taxpayer shall be adjusted to
arrive at Oklahoma taxable income for corporations and Oklahoma
adjusted gross income for individuals, as follows:
1. There shall be added interest income on obligations of any
state or political subdivision thereto which is not otherwise
exempted pursuant to other laws of this state, to the extent that
such interest is not included in taxable income and adjusted gross
income.
2. There shall be deducted amounts included in such income that
the state is prohibited from taxing because of the provisions of the
Federal Constitution, the State Constitution, federal laws or laws
of Oklahoma.
3. The amount of any federal net operating loss deduction shall
be adjusted as follows:
a. For carryovers and carrybacks to taxable years
beginning before January 1, 1981, the amount of any
net operating loss deduction allowed to a taxpayer for
federal income tax purposes shall be reduced to an
amount which is the same portion thereof as the loss
from sources within this state, as determined pursuant
to this section and Section 2362 of this title, for
the taxable year in which such loss is sustained is of
the total loss for such year;

HB1200 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b. For carryovers and carrybacks to taxable years
beginning after December 31, 1980, the amount of any
net operating loss deduction allowed for the taxable
year shall be an amount equal to the aggregate of the
Oklahoma net operating loss carryovers and carrybacks
to such year. Oklahoma net operating losses shall be
separately determined by reference to Section 172 of
the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 172, as
modified by the Oklahoma Income Tax Act, Section 2351
et seq. of this title, and shall be allowed without
regard to the existence of a federal net operating
loss. For tax years beginning after December 31,
2000, and ending before January 1, 2008, the years to
which such losses may be carried shall be determined
solely by reference to Section 172 of the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 172, with the
exception that the terms "net operating loss" and
"taxable income" shall be replaced with "Oklahoma net
operating loss" and "Oklahoma taxable income". For
tax years beginning after December 31, 2007, and
ending before January 1, 2009, years to which such
losses may be carried back shall be limited to two (2)
years. For tax years beginning after December 31,
2008, the years to which such losses may be carried
HB1200 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

back shall be determined solely by reference to
Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.,
Section 172, with the exception that the terms "net
operating loss" and "taxable income" shall be replaced
with "Oklahoma net operating loss" and "Oklahoma
taxable income".
4. Items of the following nature shall be allocated as
indicated. Allowable deductions attributable to items separately
allocable in subparagraphs a, b and c of this paragraph, whether or
not such items of income were actually received, shall be allocated
on the same basis as those items:
a. Income from real and tangible personal property, such
as rents, oil and mining production or royalties, and
gains or losses from sales of such property, shall be
allocated in accordance with the situs of such
property;
b. Income from intangible personal property, such as
interest, dividends, patent or copyright royalties,
and gains or losses from sales of such property, shall
be allocated in accordance with the domiciliary situs
of the taxpayer, except that:
(1) where such property has acquired a nonunitary
business or commercial situs apart from the
domicile of the taxpayer such income shall be
HB1200 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

allocated in accordance with such business or
commercial situs; interest income from
investments held to generate working capital for
a unitary business enterprise shall be included
in apportionable income; a resident trust or
resident estate shall be treated as having a
separate commercial or business situs insofar as
undistributed income is concerned, but shall not
be treated as having a separate commercial or
business situs insofar as distributed income is
concerned,
(2) for taxable years beginning after December 31,
2003, capital or ordinary gains or losses from
the sale of an ownership interest in a publicly
traded partnership, as defined by Section 7704(b)
of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be allocated
to this state in the ratio of the original cost
of such partnership's tangible property in this
state to the original cost of such partnership's
tangible property everywhere, as determined at
the time of the sale; if more than fifty percent
(50%) of the value of the partnership's assets
consists of intangible assets, capital or
ordinary gains or losses from the sale of an
HB1200 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

ownership interest in the partnership shall be
allocated to this state in accordance with the
sales factor of the partnership for its first
full tax period immediately preceding its tax
period during which the ownership interest in the
partnership was sold; the provisions of this
division shall only apply if the capital or
ordinary gains or losses from the sale of an
ownership interest in a partnership do not
constitute qualifying gain receiving capital
treatment as defined in subparagraph a of
paragraph 2 of subsection F of this section,
(3) income from such property which is required to be
allocated pursuant to the provisions of paragraph
5 of this subsection shall be allocated as herein
provided;
c. Net income or loss from a business activity which is
not a part of business carried on within or without
the state of a unitary character shall be separately
allocated to the state in which such activity is
conducted;
d. In the case of a manufacturing or processing
enterprise the business of which in Oklahoma consists
solely of marketing its products by:
HB1200 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(1) sales having a situs without this state, shipped
directly to a point from without the state to a
purchaser within the state, commonly known as
interstate sales,
(2) sales of the product stored in public warehouses
within the state pursuant to "in transit"
tariffs, as prescribed and allowed by the
Interstate Commerce Commission, to a purchaser
within the state,
(3) sales of the product stored in public warehouses
within the state where the shipment to such
warehouses is not covered by "in transit"
tariffs, as prescribed and allowed by the
Interstate Commerce Commission, to a purchaser
within or without the state,
the Oklahoma net income shall, at the option of the
taxpayer, be that portion of the total net income of
the taxpayer for federal income tax purposes derived
from the manufacture and/or processing and sales
everywhere as determined by the ratio of the sales
defined in this section made to the purchaser within
the state to the total sales everywhere. The term
"public warehouse" as used in this subparagraph means

HB1200 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

a licensed public warehouse, the principal business of
which is warehousing merchandise for the public;
e. In the case of insurance companies, Oklahoma taxable
income shall be taxable income of the taxpayer for
federal tax purposes, as adjusted for the adjustments
provided pursuant to the provisions of paragraphs 1
and 2 of this subsection, apportioned as follows:
(1) except as otherwise provided by division (2) of
this subparagraph, taxable income of an insurance
company for a taxable year shall be apportioned
to this state by multiplying such income by a
fraction, the numerator of which is the direct
premiums written for insurance on property or
risks in this state, and the denominator of which
is the direct premiums written for insurance on
property or risks everywhere. For purposes of
this subsection, the term "direct premiums
written" means the total amount of direct
premiums written, assessments and annuity
considerations as reported for the taxable year
on the annual statement filed by the company with
the Insurance Commissioner in the form approved
by the National Association of Insurance

HB1200 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Commissioners, or such other form as may be
prescribed in lieu thereof,
(2) if the principal source of premiums written by an
insurance company consists of premiums for
reinsurance accepted by it, the taxable income of
such company shall be apportioned to this state
by multiplying such income by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the sum of (a) direct
premiums written for insurance on property or
risks in this state, plus (b) premiums written
for reinsurance accepted in respect of property
or risks in this state, and the denominator of
which is the sum of (c) direct premiums written
for insurance on property or risks everywhere,
plus (d) premiums written for reinsurance
accepted in respect of property or risks
everywhere. For purposes of this paragraph,
premiums written for reinsurance accepted in
respect of property or risks in this state,
whether or not otherwise determinable, may at the
election of the company be determined on the
basis of the proportion which premiums written
for insurance accepted from companies
commercially domiciled in Oklahoma bears to
HB1200 HFLR Page 9
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

premiums written for reinsurance accepted from
all sources, or alternatively in the proportion
which the sum of the direct premiums written for
insurance on property or risks in this state by
each ceding company from which reinsurance is
accepted bears to the sum of the total direct
premiums written by each such ceding company for
the taxable year.
5. The a. Except as otherwise provided by subparagraph b or c
of this paragraph, for taxable years beginning not
later than December 31, 2025, the net income or loss
remaining after the separate allocation in paragraph 4
of this subsection, being that which is derived from a
unitary business enterprise, shall be apportioned to
this state on the basis of the arithmetical average of
three factors consisting of property, payroll and
sales or gross revenue enumerated as subparagraphs a,
b and c of this paragraph divisions (1), (2), and (3)
of subparagraph d of this paragraph. Net income or
loss as used in this paragraph includes that derived
from patent or copyright royalties, purchase
discounts, and interest on accounts receivable
relating to or arising from a business activity, the
income from which is apportioned pursuant to this
HB1200 HFLR Page 10
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

subsection, including the sale or other disposition of
such property and any other property used in the
unitary enterprise. Deductions used in computing such
net income or loss shall not include taxes based on or
measured by income. Provided, for
b. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2026, qualifying corporations may elect to use a
single sales factor apportionment comprising sales as
one hundred percent (100%) of the apportionment or the
corporation may elect to compute Oklahoma taxable
income using the apportionment methodology in which
each of the three factors in subparagraph d of this
paragraph is equally weighted and an arithmetical
average of the three factors is determined as
otherwise provided by this paragraph. A qualifying
corporation is one whose property for purposes of the
tax imposed by Section 2355 of this title has an
initial cumulative investment cost equaling or
exceeding Two Hundred Million Dollars
($200,000,000.00) One Hundred Million Dollars
($100,000,000.00) over three (3) years and such
investment is made on or after July 1, 1997 January 1,
2018, or for corporations a corporation which expand
expands their property or facilities or which makes
HB1200 HFLR Page 11
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

improvements or upgrades or any combination of such
expenditures which shall be valued at the original
costs, prior to federal adjustments, at the time of
acquisition by the corporation and adjusted by
subsequent capital additions or improvements thereto
and partial disposition thereof, by reason of sale,
exchange, or abandonment, in this state and such
expansion has, improvements, upgrades, or expenditures
have an investment cost equaling or exceeding Two
Hundred Million Dollars ($200,000,000.00) One Hundred
Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) over a period not to
exceed three (3) years, and such expansion,
improvements, upgrades, or any combination of such
expenditures is commenced on or after January 1, 2000,
the three factors shall be apportioned with property
and payroll, each comprising twenty-five percent (25%)
of the apportionment factor and sales comprising fifty
percent (50%) of the apportionment factor January 1,
2018. The As used in this subparagraph, investments,
improvements, or expenditures shall include but not be
limited to:
(1) expenditures for intangible drilling costs, as
defined in Internal Revenue Code Section 263(c),
without regard to whether such intangible
HB1200 HFLR Page 12
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

drilling costs are capitalized or expensed for
federal income tax purposes,
(2) track structure expenditures, as defined in
Internal Revenue Procedure 2001-46, without
regard to whether such track costs are
capitalized or expensed for federal income tax
purposes, and
(3) property received in a transaction that qualifies
as an Internal Revenue Code Section 332
liquidation; the investment period for such
property shall be the original investment period
of the liquidating corporation.
c. For any other corporation, for taxable years beginning
on or after January 1, 2026, Oklahoma taxable income
shall be computed using a single sales factor
comprising one hundred percent (100%) of the
apportionment and the corporation shall not use an
arithmetic average of the three factors consisting of
property, payroll, and sales. For the applicable tax
years, the apportionment factors shall be computed as
follows and for corporations required to use the
single sales factor the provisions of subparagraph d
of this paragraph shall be used to determine Oklahoma
taxable income as provided therein.
HB1200 HFLR Page 13
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

d. For corporations required or electing to use a single
sales factor apportionment, the provisions of division
(3) of this subparagraph shall be used to determine
Oklahoma taxable income as provided therein. For the
applicable tax years, or for qualifying corporations
electing the three-factor apportionment, the
apportionment factors shall be computed as follows:
a.
(1) The property factor is a fraction, the numerator
of which is the average value of the taxpayer's
real and tangible personal property owned or
rented and used in this state during the tax
period and the denominator of which is the
average value of all the taxpayer's real and
tangible personal property everywhere owned or
rented and used during the tax period.
(1)
(a) Property, the income from which is
separately allocated in paragraph 4 of this
subsection, shall not be included in
determining this fraction. The numerator of
the fraction shall include a portion of the
investment in transportation and other
equipment having no fixed situs, such as
HB1200 HFLR Page 14
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

rolling stock, buses, trucks and trailers,
including machinery and equipment carried
thereon, airplanes, salespersons'
automobiles and other similar equipment, in
the proportion that miles traveled in
Oklahoma by such equipment bears to total
miles traveled,
(2)
(b) Property owned by the taxpayer is valued at
its original cost. Property rented by the
taxpayer is valued at eight times the net
annual rental rate. Net annual rental rate
is the annual rental rate paid by the
taxpayer, less any annual rental rate
received by the taxpayer from subrentals,
(3)
(c) The average value of property shall be
determined by averaging the values at the
beginning and ending of the tax period but
the Oklahoma Tax Commission may require the
averaging of monthly values during the tax
period if reasonably required to reflect
properly the average value of the taxpayer's
property;
HB1200 HFLR Page 15
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b.
(2) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator
of which is the total compensation for services
rendered in the state during the tax period, and
the denominator of which is the total
compensation for services rendered everywhere
during the tax period. "Compensation", as used
in this subsection division means those paid-for
services to the extent related to the unitary
business but does not include officers' salaries,
wages and other compensation.
(1)
(a) In the case of a transportation enterprise,
the numerator of the fraction shall include
a portion of such expenditure in connection
with employees operating equipment over a
fixed route, such as railroad employees,
airline pilots, or bus drivers, in this
state only a part of the time, in the
proportion that mileage traveled in Oklahoma
bears to total mileage traveled by such
employees,
(2)

HB1200 HFLR Page 16
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(b) In any case the numerator of the fraction
shall include a portion of such expenditures
in connection with itinerant employees, such
as traveling salespersons, in this state
only a part of the time, in the proportion
that time spent in Oklahoma bears to total
time spent in furtherance of the enterprise
by such employees;
c.
(3) The sales factor is a fraction, the numerator of
which is the total sales or gross revenue of the
taxpayer in this state during the tax period, and
the denominator of which is the total sales or
gross revenue of the taxpayer everywhere during
the tax period. "Sales", as used in this
subsection division does not include sales or
gross revenue which are separately allocated in
paragraph 4 of this subsection.
(1)
(a) Sales of tangible personal property have a
situs in this state if the property is
delivered or shipped to a purchaser other
than the United States government, within
this state regardless of the FOB point or
HB1200 HFLR Page 17
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

other conditions of the sale; or the
property is shipped from an office, store,
warehouse, factory or other place of storage
in this state and (a) the purchaser is the
United States government or (b) the taxpayer
is not doing business in the state of the
destination of the shipment.
(2)
(b) In the case of a railroad or interurban
railway enterprise, the numerator of the
fraction shall not be less than the
allocation of revenues to this state as
shown in its annual report to the
Corporation Commission.
(3)
(c) In the case of an airline, truck or bus
enterprise or freight car, tank car,
refrigerator car or other railroad equipment
enterprise, the numerator of the fraction
shall include a portion of revenue from
interstate transportation in the proportion
that interstate mileage traveled in Oklahoma
bears to total interstate mileage traveled.
(4)
HB1200 HFLR Page 18
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(d) In the case of an oil, gasoline or gas
pipeline enterprise, the numerator of the
fraction shall be either the total of
traffic units of the enterprise within
Oklahoma or the revenue allocated to
Oklahoma based upon miles moved, at the
option of the taxpayer, and the denominator
of which shall be the total of traffic units
of the enterprise or the revenue of the
enterprise everywhere as appropriate to the
numerator. A "traffic unit" is hereby
defined as the transportation for a distance
of one (1) mile of one (1) barrel of oil,
one (1) gallon of gasoline or one thousand
(1,000) cubic feet of natural or casinghead
gas, as the case may be.
(5)
(e) In the case of a telephone or telegraph or
other communication enterprise, the
numerator of the fraction shall include that
portion of the interstate revenue as is
allocated pursuant to the accounting
procedures prescribed by the Federal
Communications Commission; provided that in
HB1200 HFLR Page 19
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

respect to each corporation or business
entity required by the Federal
Communications Commission to keep its books
and records in accordance with a uniform
system of accounts prescribed by such
Commission, the intrastate net income shall
be determined separately in the manner
provided by such uniform system of accounts
and only the interstate income shall be
subject to allocation pursuant to the
provisions of this paragraph 4 of this
subsection. Provided further, that the
gross revenue factors shall be those as are
determined pursuant to the accounting
procedures prescribed by the Federal
Communications Commission.
In any case where the apportionment of the three factors
prescribed in this paragraph division (1), (2), or (3) of this
subparagraph attributes to Oklahoma a portion of net income of the
enterprise out of all appropriate proportion to the property owned
and/or business transacted within this state, because of the fact
that one or more of the factors so prescribed are not employed to
any appreciable extent in furtherance of the enterprise; or because
one or more factors not so prescribed are employed to a considerable
HB1200 HFLR Page 20
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

exte nt in furtherance of the enterprise; or because of other
reasons, the Tax Commission is empowered to permit, after a showing
by taxpayer that an excessive portion of net income has been
attributed to Oklahoma, or require, when in its judgment an
insufficient portion of net income has been attributed to Oklahoma,
the elimination, substitution, or use of additional factors, or
reduction or increase in the weight of such prescribed factors.
Provided, however, that any such variance from such prescribed
factors which has the effect of increasing the portion of net income
attributable to Oklahoma must not be inherently arbitrary, and
application of the recomputed final apportionment to the net income
of the enterprise must attribute to Oklahoma only a reasonable
portion thereof.
6. For calendar years 1997 and 1998, the owner of a new or
expanded agricultural commodity processing facility in this state
may exclude from Oklahoma taxable income, or in the case of an
individual, the Oklahoma adjusted gross income, fifteen percent
(15%) of the investment by the owner in the new or expanded
agricultural commodity processing facility. For calendar year 1999,
and all subsequent years, the percentage, not to exceed fifteen
percent (15%), available to the owner of a new or expanded
agricultural commodity processing facility in this state claiming
the exemption shall be adjusted annually so that the total estimated
reduction in tax liability does not exceed One Million Dollars
HB1200 HFLR Page 21
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

($1, 000,000.00) annually. The Tax Commission shall promulgate rules
for determining the percentage of the investment which each eligible
taxpayer may exclude. The exclusion provided by this paragraph
shall be taken in the taxable year when the investment is made. In
the event the total reduction in tax liability authorized by this
paragraph exceeds One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) in any
calendar year, the Tax Commission shall permit any excess over One
Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) and shall factor such excess into
the percentage for subsequent years. Any amount of the exemption
permitted to be excluded pursuant to the provisions of this
paragraph but not used in any year may be carried forward as an
exemption from income pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph
for a period not exceeding six (6) years following the year in which
the investment was originally made.
For purposes of this paragraph:
a. "Agricultural commodity processing facility" means
building, structures, fixtures and improvements used
or operated primarily for the processing or production
of marketable products from agricultural commodities.
The term shall also mean a dairy operation that
requires a depreciable investment of at least Two
Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) and which
produces milk from dairy cows. The term does not
include a facility that provides only, and nothing
HB1200 HFLR Page 22
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

more than, storage, cleaning, drying or transportation
of agricultural commodities, and
b. "Facility" means each part of the facility which is
used in a process primarily for:
(1) the processing of agricultural commodities,
including receiving or storing agricultural
commodities, or the production of milk at a dairy
operation,
(2) transporting the agricultural commodities or
product before, during or after the processing,
or
(3) packaging or otherwise preparing the product for
sale or shipment.
7. Despite any provision to the contrary in paragraph 3 of this
subsection, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 1999, in
the case of a taxpayer which has a farming loss, such farming loss
shall be considered a net operating loss carryback in accordance
with and to the extent of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.,
Section 172(b)(G). However, the amount of the net operating loss
carryback shall not exceed the lesser of:
a. Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00), or
b. the loss properly shown on Schedule F of the Internal
Revenue Service Form 1040 reduced by one-half (1/2) of

HB1200 HFLR Page 23
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the income from all other sources other than reflected
on Schedule F.
8. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 1995, all
qualified wages equal to the federal income tax credit set forth in
26 U.S.C.A., Section 45A, shall be deducted from taxable income.
The deduction allowed pursuant to this paragraph shall only be
permitted for the tax years in which the federal tax credit pursuant
to 26 U.S.C.A., Section 45A, is allowed. For purposes of this
paragraph, "qualified wages" means those wages used to calculate the
federal credit pursuant to 26 U.S.C.A., Section 45A.
9. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005, an
employer that is eligible for and utilizes the Safety Pays OSHA
Consultation Service provided by the Oklahoma Department of Labor
shall receive an exemption from taxable income in the amount of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for the tax year that the service is
utilized.
10. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010,
there shall be added to Oklahoma taxable income an amount equal to
the amount of deferred income not included in such taxable income
pursuant to Section 108(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986
as amended by Section 1231 of the American Recovery and Reinvestment
Act of 2009 (P.L. No. 111-5). There shall be subtracted from
Oklahoma taxable income an amount equal to the amount of deferred
income included in such taxable income pursuant to Section 108(i)(1)
HB1200 HFLR Page 24
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

of t he Internal Revenue Code by Section 1231 of the American
Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (P.L. No. 111-5).
11. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019,
there shall be subtracted from Oklahoma taxable income or adjusted
gross income any item of income or gain, and there shall be added to
Oklahoma taxable income or adjusted gross income any item of loss or
deduction that in the absence of an election pursuant to the
provisions of the Pass-Through Entity Tax Equity Act of 2019 would
be allocated to a member or to an indirect member of an electing
pass-through entity pursuant to Section 2351 et seq. of this title,
if (i) the electing pass-through entity has accounted for such item
in computing its Oklahoma net entity income or loss pursuant to the
provisions of the Pass-Through Entity Tax Equity Act of 2019, and
(ii) the total amount of tax attributable to any resulting Oklahoma
net entity income has been paid. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall
promulgate rules for the reporting of such exclusion to direct and
indirect members of the electing pass-through entity. As used in
this paragraph, "electing pass-through entity", "indirect member",
and "member" shall be defined in the same manner as prescribed by
Section 2355.1P-2 of this title. Notwithstanding the application of
this paragraph, the adjusted tax basis of any ownership interest in
a pass-through entity for purposes of Section 2351 et seq. of this
title shall be equal to its adjusted tax basis for federal income
tax purposes.
HB1200 HFLR Page 25
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. 1. The taxable income of any corporation shall be further
adjusted to arrive at Oklahoma taxable income, except those
corporations electing treatment as provided in subchapter S of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 1361 et seq., and Section
2365 of this title, deductions pursuant to the provisions of the
Accelerated Cost Recovery System as defined and allowed in the
Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981, Public Law 97-34, 26 U.S.C.,
Section 168, for depreciation of assets placed into service after
December 31, 1981, shall not be allowed in calculating Oklahoma
taxable income. Such corporations shall be allowed a deduction for
depreciation of assets placed into service after December 31, 1981,
in accordance with provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C., Section 1 et seq., in effect immediately prior to the
enactment of the Accelerated Cost Recovery System. The Oklahoma tax
basis for all such assets placed into service after December 31,
1981, calculated in this section shall be retained and utilized for
all Oklahoma income tax purposes through the final disposition of
such assets.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Oklahoma Income Tax
Act, Section 2351 et seq. of this title, or of the Internal Revenue
Code to the contrary, this subsection shall control calculation of
depreciation of assets placed into service after December 31, 1981,
and before January 1, 1983.

HB1200 HFLR Page 26
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

For assets placed in service and held by a corporation in which
accelerated cost recovery system was previously disallowed, an
adjustment to taxable income is required in the first taxable year
beginning after December 31, 1982, to reconcile the basis of such
assets to the basis allowed in the Internal Revenue Code. The
purpose of this adjustment is to equalize the basis and allowance
for depreciation accounts between that reported to the Internal
Revenue Service and that reported to Oklahoma.
2. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2009, and
ending on or before December 31, 2009, there shall be added to
Oklahoma taxable income any amount in excess of One Hundred Seventy-
five Thousand Dollars ($175,000.00) which has been deducted as a
small business expense under Internal Revenue Code, Section 179 as
provided in the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.
C. 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 1987, the
taxable income of any corporation shall be further adjusted to
arrive at Oklahoma taxable income for transfers of technology to
qualified small businesses located in Oklahoma. Such transferor
corporation shall be allowed an exemption from taxable income of an
amount equal to the amount of royalty payment received as a result
of such transfer; provided, however, such amount shall not exceed
ten percent (10%) of the amount of gross proceeds received by such
transferor corporation as a result of the technology transfer. Such
exemption shall be allowed for a period not to exceed ten (10) years
HB1200 HFLR Page 27
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

from the date of receipt of the first royalty payment accruing from
such transfer. No exemption may be claimed for transfers of
technology to qualified small businesses made prior to January 1,
1988.
2. For purposes of this subsection:
a. "Qualified small business" means an entity, whether
organized as a corporation, partnership, or
proprietorship, organized for profit with its
principal place of business located within this state
and which meets the following criteria:
(1) Capitalization of not more than Two Hundred Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00),
(2) Having at least fifty percent (50%) of its
employees and assets located in Oklahoma at the
time of the transfer, and
(3) Not a subsidiary or affiliate of the transferor
corporation;
b. "Technology" means a proprietary process, formula,
pattern, device or compilation of scientific or
technical information which is not in the public
domain;
c. "Transferor corporation" means a corporation which is
the exclusive and undisputed owner of the technology
at the time the transfer is made; and
HB1200 HFLR Page 28
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

d. "Gross proceeds" means the total amount of
consideration for the transfer of technology, whether
the consideration is in money or otherwise.
D. 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005, the
taxable income of any corporation, estate or trust, shall be further
adjusted for qualifying gains receiving capital treatment. Such
corporations, estates or trusts shall be allowed a deduction from
Oklahoma taxable income for the amount of qualifying gains receiving
capital treatment earned by the corporation, estate or trust during
the taxable year and included in the federal taxable income of such
corporation, estate or trust.
2. As used in this subsection:
a. "qualifying gains receiving capital treatment" means
the amount of net capital gains, as defined in Section
1222(11) of the Internal Revenue Code, included in the
federal income tax return of the corporation, estate
or trust that result from:
(1) the sale of real property or tangible personal
property located within Oklahoma that has been
directly or indirectly owned by the corporation,
estate or trust for a holding period of at least
five (5) years prior to the date of the
transaction from which such net capital gains
arise,
HB1200 HFLR Page 29
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(2) the sale of stock or on the sale of an ownership
interest in an Oklahoma company, limited
liability company, or partnership where such
stock or ownership interest has been directly or
indirectly owned by the corporation, estate or
trust for a holding period of at least three (3)
years prior to the date of the transaction from
which the net capital gains arise, or
(3) the sale of real property, tangible personal
property or intangible personal property located
within Oklahoma as part of the sale of all or
substantially all of the assets of an Oklahoma
company, limited liability company, or
partnership where such property has been directly
or indirectly owned by such entity owned by the
owners of such entity, and used in or derived
from such entity for a period of at least three
(3) years prior to the date of the transaction
from which the net capital gains arise,
b. "holding period" means an uninterrupted period of
time. The holding period shall include any additional
period when the property was held by another
individual or entity, if such additional period is

HB1200 HFLR Page 30
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

included in the taxpayer's holding period for the
asset pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code,
c. "Oklahoma company", "limited liability company", or
"partnership" means an entity whose primary
headquarters have been located in Oklahoma for at
least three (3) uninterrupted years prior to the date
of the transaction from which the net capital gains
arise,
d. "direct" means the taxpayer directly owns the asset,
and
e. "indirect" means the taxpayer owns an interest in a
pass-through entity (or chain of pass-through
entities) that sells the asset that gives rise to the
qualifying gains receiving capital treatment.
(1) With respect to sales of real property or
tangible personal property located within
Oklahoma, the deduction described in this
subsection shall not apply unless the pass-
through entity that makes the sale has held the
property for not less than five (5) uninterrupted
years prior to the date of the transaction that
created the capital gain, and each pass-through
entity included in the chain of ownership has
been a member, partner, or shareholder of the
HB1200 HFLR Page 31
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

pass-through entity in the tier immediately below
it for an uninterrupted period of not less than
five (5) years.
(2) With respect to sales of stock or ownership
interest in or sales of all or substantially all
of the assets of an Oklahoma company, limited
liability company, or partnership, the deduction
described in this subsection shall not apply
unless the pass-through entity that makes the
sale has held the stock or ownership interest or
the assets for not less than three (3)
uninterrupted years prior to the date of the
transaction that created the capital gain, and
each pass-through entity included in the chain of
ownership has been a member, partner or
shareholder of the pass-through entity in the
tier immediately below it for an uninterrupted
period of not less than three (3) years.
E. The Oklahoma adjusted gross income of any individual
taxpayer shall be further adjusted as follows to arrive at Oklahoma
taxable income:
1. a. In the case of individuals, there shall be added or
deducted, as the case may be, the difference necessary
to allow personal exemptions of One Thousand Dollars
HB1200 HFLR Page 32
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

($1,000.00) in lieu of the personal exemptions allowed
by the Internal Revenue Code.
b. There shall be allowed an additional exemption of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each taxpayer or
spouse who is blind at the close of the tax year. For
purposes of this subparagraph, an individual is blind
only if the central visual acuity of the individual
does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with
correcting lenses, or if the visual acuity of the
individual is greater than 20/200, but is accompanied
by a limitation in the fields of vision such that the
widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle
no greater than twenty (20) degrees.
c. There shall be allowed an additional exemption of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each taxpayer or
spouse who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older at
the close of the tax year based upon the filing status
and federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer.
Taxpayers with the following filing status may claim
this exemption if the federal adjusted gross income
does not exceed:
(1) Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) if
married and filing jointly,

HB1200 HFLR Page 33
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(2) Twelve Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($12,500.00)
if married and filing separately,
(3) Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) if single,
and
(4) Nineteen Thousand Dollars ($19,000.00) if a
qualifying head of household.
Provided, for taxable years beginning after December
31, 1999, amounts included in the calculation of
federal adjusted gross income pursuant to the
conversion of a traditional individual retirement
account to a Roth individual retirement account shall
be excluded from federal adjusted gross income for
purposes of the income thresholds provided in this
subparagraph.
2. a. For taxable years beginning on or before December 31,
2005, in the case of individuals who use the standard
deduction in determining taxable income, there shall
be added or deducted, as the case may be, the
difference necessary to allow a standard deduction in
lieu of the standard deduction allowed by the Internal
Revenue Code, in an amount equal to the larger of
fifteen percent (15%) of the Oklahoma adjusted gross
income or One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), but not to
exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), except that
HB1200 HFLR Page 34
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

in the case of a married individual filing a separate
return such deduction shall be the larger of fifteen
percent (15%) of such Oklahoma adjusted gross income
or Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), but not to exceed
the maximum amount of One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00).
b. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2006, and before January 1, 2007, in the case of
individuals who use the standard deduction in
determining taxable income, there shall be added or
deducted, as the case may be, the difference necessary
to allow a standard deduction in lieu of the standard
deduction allowed by the Internal Revenue Code, in an
amount equal to:
(1) Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00), if the filing
status is married filing joint, head of household
or qualifying widow, or
(2) Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), if the filing
status is single or married filing separate.
c. For the taxable year beginning on January 1, 2007, and
ending December 31, 2007, in the case of individuals
who use the standard deduction in determining taxable
income, there shall be added or deducted, as the case
may be, the difference necessary to allow a standard
HB1200 HFLR Page 35
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

deduction in lieu of the standard deduction allowed by
the Internal Revenue Code, in an amount equal to:
(1) Five Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($5,500.00),
if the filing status is married filing joint or
qualifying widow, or
(2) Four Thousand One Hundred Twenty-five Dollars
($4,125.00) for a head of household, or
(3) Two Thousand Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars
($2,750.00), if the filing status is single or
married filing separate.
d. For the taxable year beginning on January 1, 2008, and
ending December 31, 2008, in the case of individuals
who use the standard deduction in determining taxable
income, there shall be added or deducted, as the case
may be, the difference necessary to allow a standard
deduction in lieu of the standard deduction allowed by
the Internal Revenue Code, in an amount equal to:
(1) Six Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($6,500.00), if
the filing status is married filing joint or
qualifying widow,
(2) Four Thousand Eight Hundred Seventy-five Dollars
($4,875.00) for a head of household, or


HB1200 HFLR Page 36
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(3) Three Thousand Two Hundred Fifty Dollars
($3,250.00), if the filing status is single or
married filing separate.
e. For the taxable year beginning on January 1, 2009, and
ending December 31, 2009, in the case of individuals
who use the standard deduction in determining taxable
income, there shall be added or deducted, as the case
may be, the difference necessary to allow a standard
deduction in lieu of the standard deduction allowed by
the Internal Revenue Code, in an amount equal to:
(1) Eight Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($8,500.00),
if the filing status is married filing joint or
qualifying widow,
(2) Six Thousand Three Hundred Seventy-five Dollars
($6,375.00) for a head of household, or
(3) Four Thousand Two Hundred Fifty Dollars
($4,250.00), if the filing status is single or
married filing separate.
Oklahoma adjusted gross income shall be increased by
any amounts paid for motor vehicle excise taxes which
were deducted as allowed by the Internal Revenue Code.
f. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2010, and ending on December 31, 2016, in the case of
individuals who use the standard deduction in
HB1200 HFLR Page 37
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

determining taxable income, there shall be added or
deducted, as the case may be, the difference necessary
to allow a standard deduction equal to the standard
deduction allowed by the Internal Revenue Code, based
upon the amount and filing status prescribed by such
Code for purposes of filing federal individual income
tax returns.
g. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2017, in the case of individuals who use the standard
deduction in determining taxable income, there shall
be added or deducted, as the case may be, the
difference necessary to allow a standard deduction in
lieu of the standard deduction allowed by the Internal
Revenue Code, as follows:
(1) Six Thousand Three Hundred Fifty Dollars
($6,350.00) for single or married filing
separately,
(2) Twelve Thousand Seven Hundred Dollars
($12,700.00) for married filing jointly or
qualifying widower with dependent child, and
(3) Nine Thousand Three Hundred Fifty Dollars
($9,350.00) for head of household.
3. a. In the case of resident and part-year resident
individuals having adjusted gross income from sources
HB1200 HFLR Page 38
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

both within and without the state, the itemized or
standard deductions and personal exemptions shall be
reduced to an amount which is the same portion of the
total thereof as Oklahoma adjusted gross income is of
adjusted gross income. To the extent itemized
deductions include allowable moving expense, proration
of moving expense shall not be required or permitted
but allowable moving expense shall be fully deductible
for those taxpayers moving within or into Oklahoma and
no part of moving expense shall be deductible for
those taxpayers moving without or out of Oklahoma.
All other itemized or standard deductions and personal
exemptions shall be subject to proration as provided
by law.
b. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2018, the net amount of itemized deductions allowable
on an Oklahoma income tax return, subject to the
provisions of paragraph 24 of this subsection, shall
not exceed Seventeen Thousand Dollars ($17,000.00).
For purposes of this subparagraph, charitable
contributions and medical expenses deductible for
federal income tax purposes shall be excluded from the
amount of Seventeen Thousand Dollars ($17,000.00) as
specified by this subparagraph.
HB1200 HFLR Page 39
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

4. A resident individual with a physical disability
constituting a substantial handicap to employment may deduct from
Oklahoma adjusted gross income such expenditures to modify a motor
vehicle, home or workplace as are necessary to compensate for his or
her handicap. A veteran certified by the Department of Veterans
Affairs of the federal government as having a service-connected
disability shall be conclusively presumed to be an individual with a
physical disability constituting a substantial handicap to
employment. The Tax Commission shall promulgate rules containing a
list of combinations of common disabilities and modifications which
may be presumed to qualify for this deduction. The Tax Commission
shall prescribe necessary requirements for verification.
5. a. Before July 1, 2010, the first One Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) received by any person
from the United States as salary or compensation in
any form, other than retirement benefits, as a member
of any component of the Armed Forces of the United
States shall be deducted from taxable income.
b. On or after July 1, 2010, one hundred percent (100%)
of the income received by any person from the United
States as salary or compensation in any form, other
than retirement benefits, as a member of any component
of the Armed Forces of the United States shall be
deducted from taxable income.
HB1200 HFLR Page 40
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

c. Whenever the filing of a timely income tax return by a
member of the Armed Forces of the United States is
made impracticable or impossible of accomplishment by
reason of:
(1) absence from the United States, which term
includes only the states and the District of
Columbia,
(2) absence from the State of Oklahoma while on
active duty, or
(3) confinement in a hospital within the United
States for treatment of wounds, injuries or
disease,
the time for filing a return and paying an income tax
shall be and is hereby extended without incurring
liability for interest or penalties, to the fifteenth
day of the third month following the month in which:
(a) Such individual shall return to the United
States if the extension is granted pursuant
to subparagraph a of this paragraph, return
to the State of Oklahoma if the extension is
granted pursuant to subparagraph b of this
paragraph or be discharged from such
hospital if the extension is granted

HB1200 HFLR Page 41
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

pursuant to subparagraph c of this
paragraph, or
(b) An executor, administrator, or conservator
of the estate of the taxpayer is appointed,
whichever event occurs the earliest.
Provided, that the Tax Commission may, in its discretion, grant
any member of the Armed Forces of the United States an extension of
time for filing of income tax returns and payment of income tax
without incurring liabilities for interest or penalties. Such
extension may be granted only when in the judgment of the Tax
Commission a good cause exists therefor and may be for a period in
excess of six (6) months. A record of every such extension granted,
and the reason therefor, shall be kept.
6. Before July 1, 2010, the salary or any other form of
compensation, received from the United States by a member of any
component of the Armed Forces of the United States, shall be
deducted from taxable income during the time in which the person is
detained by the enemy in a conflict, is a prisoner of war or is
missing in action and not deceased; provided, after July 1, 2010,
all such salary or compensation shall be subject to the deduction as
provided pursuant to paragraph 5 of this subsection.
7. a. An individual taxpayer, whether resident or
nonresident, may deduct an amount equal to the federal

HB1200 HFLR Page 42
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

income taxes paid by the taxpayer during the taxable
year.
b. Federal taxes as described in subparagraph a of this
paragraph shall be deductible by any individual
taxpayer, whether resident or nonresident, only to the
extent they relate to income subject to taxation
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Income Tax
Act. The maximum amount allowable in the preceding
paragraph shall be prorated on the ratio of the
Oklahoma adjusted gross income to federal adjusted
gross income.
c. For the purpose of this paragraph, "federal income
taxes paid" shall mean federal income taxes, surtaxes
imposed on incomes or excess profits taxes, as though
the taxpayer was on the accrual basis. In determining
the amount of deduction for federal income taxes for
tax year 2001, the amount of the deduction shall not
be adjusted by the amount of any accelerated ten
percent (10%) tax rate bracket credit or advanced
refund of the credit received during the tax year
provided pursuant to the federal Economic Growth and
Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001, P.L. No. 107-
16, and the advanced refund of such credit shall not
be subject to taxation.
HB1200 HFLR Page 43
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

d. The provisions of this paragraph shall apply to all
taxable years ending after December 31, 1978, and
beginning before January 1, 2006.
8. Retirement benefits not to exceed Five Thousand Five Hundred
Dollars ($5,500.00) for the 2004 tax year, Seven Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) for the 2005 tax year and Ten Thousand
Dollars ($10,000.00) for the 2006 tax year and all subsequent tax
years, which are received by an individual from the civil service of
the United States, the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System,
the Teachers' Retirement System of Oklahoma, the Oklahoma Law
Enforcement Retirement System, the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and
Retirement System, the Oklahoma Police Pension and Retirement
System, the employee retirement systems created by counties pursuant
to Section 951 et seq. of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the
Uniform Retirement System for Justices and Judges, the Oklahoma
Wildlife Conservation Department Retirement Fund, the Oklahoma
Employment Security Commission Retirement Plan, or the employee
retirement systems created by municipalities pursuant to Section 48-
101 et seq. of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall be exempt
from taxable income.
9. In taxable years beginning after December 3l, 1984, Social
Security benefits received by an individual shall be exempt from
taxable income, to the extent such benefits are included in the

HB1200 HFLR Page 44
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

fede ral adjusted gross income pursuant to the provisions of Section
86 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 86.
10. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 1994, lump-
sum distributions from employer plans of deferred compensation,
which are not qualified plans within the meaning of Section 401(a)
of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 401(a), and which
are deposited in and accounted for within a separate bank account or
brokerage account in a financial institution within this state,
shall be excluded from taxable income in the same manner as a
qualifying rollover contribution to an individual retirement account
within the meaning of Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C., Section 408. Amounts withdrawn from such bank or brokerage
account, including any earnings thereon, shall be included in
taxable income when withdrawn in the same manner as withdrawals from
individual retirement accounts within the meaning of Section 408 of
the Internal Revenue Code.
11. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 1995,
contributions made to and interest received from a medical savings
account established pursuant to Sections 2621 through 2623 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall be exempt from taxable income.
12. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 1996, the
Oklahoma adjusted gross income of any individual taxpayer who is a
swine or poultry producer may be further adjusted for the deduction
for depreciation allowed for new construction or expansion costs
HB1200 HFLR Page 45
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

whic h may be computed using the same depreciation method elected for
federal income tax purposes except that the useful life shall be
seven (7) years for purposes of this paragraph. If depreciation is
allowed as a deduction in determining the adjusted gross income of
an individual, any depreciation calculated and claimed pursuant to
this section shall in no event be a duplication of any depreciation
allowed or permitted on the federal income tax return of the
individual.
13. a. In taxable years beginning before January 1, 2005,
retirement benefits not to exceed the amounts
specified in this paragraph, which are received by an
individual sixty-five (65) years of age or older and
whose Oklahoma adjusted gross income is Twenty-five
Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or less if the filing
status is single, head of household, or married filing
separate, or Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) or
less if the filing status is married filing joint or
qualifying widow, shall be exempt from taxable income.
In taxable years beginning after December 31, 2004,
retirement benefits not to exceed the amounts
specified in this paragraph, which are received by an
individual whose Oklahoma adjusted gross income is
less than the qualifying amount specified in this
paragraph, shall be exempt from taxable income.
HB1200 HFLR Page 46
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b. For purposes of this paragraph, the qualifying amount
shall be as follows:
(1) in taxable years beginning after December 31,
2004, and prior to January 1, 2007, the
qualifying amount shall be Thirty-seven Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($37,500.00) or less if the
filing status is single, head of household, or
married filing separate, or Seventy-five Thousand
Dollars ($75,000.00) or less if the filing status
is married filing jointly or qualifying widow,
(2) in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2007,
the qualifying amount shall be Fifty Thousand
Dollars ($50,000.00) or less if the filing status
is single, head of household, or married filing
separate, or One Hundred Thousand Dollars
($100,000.00) or less if the filing status is
married filing jointly or qualifying widow,
(3) in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2008,
the qualifying amount shall be Sixty-two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($62,500.00) or less if the
filing status is single, head of household, or
married filing separate, or One Hundred Twenty-
five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00) or less if

HB1200 HFLR Page 47
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the filing status is married filing jointly or
qualifying widow,
(4) in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2009,
the qualifying amount shall be One Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or less if the
filing status is single, head of household, or
married filing separate, or Two Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($200,000.00) or less if the filing
status is married filing jointly or qualifying
widow, and
(5) in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2010,
and subsequent taxable years, there shall be no
limitation upon the qualifying amount.
c. For purposes of this paragraph, "retirement benefits"
means the total distributions or withdrawals from the
following:
(1) an employee pension benefit plan which satisfies
the requirements of Section 401 of the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 401,
(2) an eligible deferred compensation plan that
satisfies the requirements of Section 457 of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 457,
(3) an individual retirement account, annuity or
trust or simplified employee pension that
HB1200 HFLR Page 48
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

satisfies the requirements of Section 408 of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 408,
(4) an employee annuity subject to the provisions of
Section 403(a) or (b) of the Internal Revenue
Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 403(a) or (b),
(5) United States Retirement Bonds which satisfy the
requirements of Section 86 of the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section 86, or
(6) lump-sum distributions from a retirement plan
which satisfies the requirements of Section
402(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.,
Section 402(e).
d. The amount of the exemption provided by this paragraph
shall be limited to Five Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($5,500.00) for the 2004 tax year, Seven Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) for the 2005 tax year and
Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for the tax year
2006 and for all subsequent tax years. Any individual
who claims the exemption provided for in paragraph 8
of this subsection shall not be permitted to claim a
combined total exemption pursuant to this paragraph
and paragraph 8 of this subsection in an amount
exceeding Five Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($5,500.00) for the 2004 tax year, Seven Thousand Five
HB1200 HFLR Page 49
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) for the 2005 tax year and
Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for the 2006 tax
year and all subsequent tax years.
14. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 1999, for an
individual engaged in production agriculture who has filed a
Schedule F form with the taxpayer's federal income tax return for
such taxable year, there shall be excluded from taxable income any
amount which was included as federal taxable income or federal
adjusted gross income and which consists of the discharge of an
obligation by a creditor of the taxpayer incurred to finance the
production of agricultural products.
15. In taxable years beginning December 31, 2000, an amount
equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount of any scholarship
or stipend received from participation in the Oklahoma Police Corps
Program, as established in Section 2-140.3 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes shall be exempt from taxable income.
16. a. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 2001,
and before January 1, 2005, there shall be allowed a
deduction in the amount of contributions to accounts
established pursuant to the Oklahoma College Savings
Plan Act. The deduction shall equal the amount of
contributions to accounts, but in no event shall the
deduction for each contributor exceed Two Thousand

HB1200 HFLR Page 50
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) each taxable year for
each account.
b. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 2004,
each taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction for
contributions to accounts established pursuant to the
Oklahoma College Savings Plan Act. The maximum annual
deduction shall equal the amount of contributions to
all such accounts plus any contributions to such
accounts by the taxpayer for prior taxable years after
December 31, 2004, which were not deducted, but in no
event shall the deduction for each tax year exceed Ten
Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each individual
taxpayer or Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) for
taxpayers filing a joint return. Any amount of a
contribution that is not deducted by the taxpayer in
the year for which the contribution is made may be
carried forward as a deduction from income for the
succeeding five (5) years. For taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2005, deductions may be
taken for contributions and rollovers made during a
taxable year and up to April 15 of the succeeding
year, or the due date of a taxpayer's state income tax
return, excluding extensions, whichever is later.

HB1200 HFLR Page 51
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Provided, a deduction for the same contribution may
not be taken for two (2) different taxable years.
c. In taxable years beginning after December 31, 2006,
deductions for contributions made pursuant to
subparagraph b of this paragraph shall be limited as
follows:
(1) for a taxpayer who qualified for the five-year
carryforward election and who takes a rollover or
nonqualified withdrawal during that period, the
tax deduction otherwise available pursuant to
subparagraph b of this paragraph shall be reduced
by the amount which is equal to the rollover or
nonqualified withdrawal, and
(2) for a taxpayer who elects to take a rollover or
nonqualified withdrawal within the same tax year
in which a contribution was made to the
taxpayer's account, the tax deduction otherwise
available pursuant to subparagraph b of this
paragraph shall be reduced by the amount of the
contribution which is equal to the rollover or
nonqualified withdrawal.
d. If a taxpayer elects to take a rollover on a
contribution for which a deduction has been taken
pursuant to subparagraph b of this paragraph within
HB1200 HFLR Page 52
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

one (1) year of the date of contribution, the amount
of such rollover shall be included in the adjusted
gross income of the taxpayer in the taxable year of
the rollover.
e. If a taxpayer makes a nonqualified withdrawal of
contributions for which a deduction was taken pursuant
to subparagraph b of this paragraph, such nonqualified
withdrawal and any earnings thereon shall be included
in the adjusted gross income of the taxpayer in the
taxable year of the nonqualified withdrawal.
f. As used in this paragraph:
(1) "non-qualified withdrawal" means a withdrawal
from an Oklahoma College Savings Plan account
other than one of the following:
(a) a qualified withdrawal,
(b) a withdrawal made as a result of the death
or disability of the designated beneficiary
of an account,
(c) a withdrawal that is made on the account of
a scholarship or the allowance or payment
described in Section 135(d)(1)(B) or (C) or
by the Internal Revenue Code, received by
the designated beneficiary to the extent the
amount of the refund does not exceed the
HB1200 HFLR Page 53
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

amount of the scholarship, allowance, or
payment, or
(d) a rollover or change of designated
beneficiary as permitted by subsection F of
Section 3970.7 of Title 70 of Oklahoma
Statutes, and
(2) "rollover" means the transfer of funds from the
Oklahoma College Savings Plan to any other plan
under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.
17. For tax years 2006 through 2021, retirement benefits
received by an individual from any component of the Armed Forces of
the United States in an amount not to exceed the greater of seventy-
five percent (75%) of such benefits or Ten Thousand Dollars
($10,000.00) shall be exempt from taxable income but in no case less
than the amount of the exemption provided by paragraph 13 of this
subsection. For tax year 2022 and subsequent tax years, retirement
benefits received by an individual from any component of the Armed
Forces of the United States shall be exempt from taxable income.
18. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2006,
retirement benefits received by federal civil service retirees,
including survivor annuities, paid in lieu of Social Security
benefits shall be exempt from taxable income to the extent such
benefits are included in the federal adjusted gross income pursuant

HB1200 HFLR Page 54
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

to t he provisions of Section 86 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C., Section 86, according to the following schedule:
a. in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2007, twenty
percent (20%) of such benefits shall be exempt,
b. in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2008, forty
percent (40%) of such benefits shall be exempt,
c. in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2009, sixty
percent (60%) of such benefits shall be exempt,
d. in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2010, eighty
percent (80%) of such benefits shall be exempt, and
e. in the taxable year beginning January 1, 2011, and
subsequent taxable years, one hundred percent (100%)
of such benefits shall be exempt.
19. a. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2007, a
resident individual may deduct up to Ten Thousand
Dollars ($10,000.00) from Oklahoma adjusted gross
income if the individual, or the dependent of the
individual, while living, donates one or more human
organs of the individual to another human being for
human organ transplantation. As used in this
paragraph, "human organ" means all or part of a liver,
pancreas, kidney, intestine, lung, or bone marrow. A
deduction that is claimed under this paragraph may be

HB1200 HFLR Page 55
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

claimed in the taxable year in which the human organ
transplantation occurs.
b. An individual may claim this deduction only once, and
the deduction may be claimed only for unreimbursed
expenses that are incurred by the individual and
related to the organ donation of the individual.
c. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this paragraph which shall
contain a specific list of expenses which may be
presumed to qualify for the deduction. The Tax
Commission shall prescribe necessary requirements for
verification.
20. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2009, there
shall be exempt from taxable income any amount received by the
beneficiary of the death benefit for an emergency medical technician
or a registered emergency medical responder provided by Section 1-
2505.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
21. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2008,
taxable income shall be increased by any unemployment compensation
exempted under Section 85(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C., Section 85(c)(2009).
22. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2008, there
shall be exempt from taxable income any payment in an amount less
than Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) received by a person as an award
HB1200 HFLR Page 56
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

for participation in a competitive livestock show event. For
purposes of this paragraph, the payment shall be treated as a
scholarship amount paid by the entity sponsoring the event and the
sponsoring entity shall cause the payment to be categorized as a
scholarship in its books and records.
23. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016,
taxable income shall be increased by any amount of state and local
sales or income taxes deducted under 26 U.S.C., Section 164 of the
Internal Revenue Code. If the amount of state and local taxes
deducted on the federal return is limited, taxable income on the
state return shall be increased only by the amount actually deducted
after any such limitations are applied.
24. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020, each
taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction for contributions to accounts
established pursuant to the Achieving a Better Life Experience
(ABLE) Program as established in Section 4001.1 et seq. of Title 56
of the Oklahoma Statutes. For any tax year, the deduction provided
for in this paragraph shall not exceed Ten Thousand Dollars
($10,000.00) for an individual taxpayer or Twenty Thousand Dollars
($20,000.00) for taxpayers filing a joint return. Any amount of
contribution not deducted by the taxpayer in the tax year for which
the contribution is made may be carried forward as a deduction from
income for up to five (5) tax years. Deductions may be taken for
contributions made during the tax year and through April 15 of the
HB1200 HFLR Page 57
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

succ eeding tax year, or through the due date of a taxpayer's state
income tax return excluding extensions, whichever is later.
Provided, a deduction for the same contribution may not be taken in
more than one (1) tax year.
F. 1. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2004, a
deduction from the Oklahoma adjusted gross income of any individual
taxpayer shall be allowed for qualifying gains receiving capital
treatment that are included in the federal adjusted gross income of
such individual taxpayer during the taxable year.
2. As used in this subsection:
a. "qualifying gains receiving capital treatment" means
the amount of net capital gains, as defined in Section
1222(11) of the Internal Revenue Code, included in an
individual taxpayer's federal income tax return that
result from:
(1) the sale of real property or tangible personal
property located within Oklahoma that has been
directly or indirectly owned by the individual
taxpayer for a holding period of at least five
(5) years prior to the date of the transaction
from which such net capital gains arise,
(2) the sale of stock or the sale of a direct or
indirect ownership interest in an Oklahoma
company, limited liability company, or
HB1200 HFLR Page 58
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

partnership where such stock or ownership
interest has been directly or indirectly owned by
the individual taxpayer for a holding period of
at least two (2) years prior to the date of the
transaction from which the net capital gains
arise, or
(3) the sale of real property, tangible personal
property or intangible personal property located
within Oklahoma as part of the sale of all or
substantially all of the assets of an Oklahoma
company, limited liability company, or
partnership or an Oklahoma proprietorship
business enterprise where such property has been
directly or indirectly owned by such entity or
business enterprise or owned by the owners of
such entity or business enterprise for a period
of at least two (2) years prior to the date of
the transaction from which the net capital gains
arise,
b. "holding period" means an uninterrupted period of
time. The holding period shall include any additional
period when the property was held by another
individual or entity, if such additional period is

HB1200 HFLR Page 59
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

included in the taxpayer's holding period for the
asset pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code,
c. "Oklahoma company," "limited liability company," or
"partnership" means an entity whose primary
headquarters have been located in Oklahoma for at
least three (3) uninterrupted years prior to the date
of the transaction from which the net capital gains
arise,
d. "direct" means the individual taxpayer directly owns
the asset,
e. "indirect" means the individual taxpayer owns an
interest in a pass-through entity (or chain of pass-
through entities) that sells the asset that gives rise
to the qualifying gains receiving capital treatment.
(1) With respect to sales of real property or
tangible personal property located within
Oklahoma, the deduction described in this
subsection shall not apply unless the pass-
through entity that makes the sale has held the
property for not less than five (5) uninterrupted
years prior to the date of the transaction that
created the capital gain, and each pass-through
entity included in the chain of ownership has
been a member, partner, or shareholder of the
HB1200 HFLR Page 60
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

pass-through entity in the tier immediately below
it for an uninterrupted period of not less than
five (5) years.
(2) With respect to sales of stock or ownership
interest in or sales of all or substantially all
of the assets of an Oklahoma company, limited
liability company, partnership or Oklahoma
proprietorship business enterprise, the deduction
described in this subsection shall not apply
unless the pass-through entity that makes the
sale has held the stock or ownership interest for
not less than two (2) uninterrupted years prior
to the date of the transaction that created the
capital gain, and each pass-through entity
included in the chain of ownership has been a
member, partner or shareholder of the pass-
through entity in the tier immediately below it
for an uninterrupted period of not less than two
(2) years. For purposes of this division,
uninterrupted ownership prior to July 1, 2007,
shall be included in the determination of the
required holding period prescribed by this
division, and

HB1200 HFLR Page 61
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

f. "Oklahoma proprietorship business enterprise" means a
business enterprise whose income and expenses have
been reported on Schedule C or F of an individual
taxpayer's federal income tax return, or any similar
successor schedule published by the Internal Revenue
Service and whose primary headquarters have been
located in Oklahoma for at least three (3)
uninterrupted years prior to the date of the
transaction from which the net capital gains arise.
G. 1. For purposes of computing its Oklahoma taxable income
under this section, the dividends-paid deduction otherwise allowed
by federal law in computing net income of a real estate investment
trust that is subject to federal income tax shall be added back in
computing the tax imposed by this state under this title if the real
estate investment trust is a captive real estate investment trust.
2. For purposes of computing its Oklahoma taxable income under
this section, a taxpayer shall add back otherwise deductible rents
and interest expenses paid to a captive real estate investment trust
that is not subject to the provisions of paragraph 1 of this
subsection. As used in this subsection:
a. the term "real estate investment trust" or "REIT"
means the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 856
of the Internal Revenue Code,

HB1200 HFLR Page 62
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b. the term "captive real estate investment trust" means
a real estate investment trust, the shares or
beneficial interests of which are not regularly traded
on an established securities market and more than
fifty percent (50%) of the voting power or value of
the beneficial interests or shares of which are owned
or controlled, directly or indirectly, or
constructively, by a single entity that is:
(1) treated as an association taxable as a
corporation under the Internal Revenue Code, and
(2) not exempt from federal income tax pursuant to
the provisions of Section 501(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
The term shall not include a real estate investment
trust that is intended to be regularly traded on an
established securities market, and that satisfies the
requirements of Section 856(a)(5) and (6) of the U.S.
Internal Revenue Code by reason of Section 856(h)(2)
of the Internal Revenue Code,
c. the term "association taxable as a corporation" shall
not include the following entities:
(1) any real estate investment trust as defined in
paragraph a of this subsection other than a
"captive real estate investment trust",
HB1200 HFLR Page 63
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(2) any qualified real estate investment trust
subsidiary under Section 856(i) of the Internal
Revenue Code, other than a qualified REIT
subsidiary of a "captive real estate investment
trust",
(3) any Listed Australian Property Trust (meaning an
Australian unit trust registered as a "Managed
Investment Scheme" under the Australian
Corporations Act in which the principal class of
units is listed on a recognized stock exchange in
Australia and is regularly traded on an
established securities market), or an entity
organized as a trust, provided that a Listed
Australian Property Trust owns or controls,
directly or indirectly, seventy-five percent
(75%) or more of the voting power or value of the
beneficial interests or shares of such trust, or
(4) any Qualified Foreign Entity, meaning a
corporation, trust, association or partnership
organized outside the laws of the United States
and which satisfies the following criteria:
(a) at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the
entity's total asset value at the close of
its taxable year is represented by real
HB1200 HFLR Page 64
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

estate assets, as defined in Section
856(c)(5)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code,
thereby including shares or certificates of
beneficial interest in any real estate
investment trust, cash and cash equivalents,
and U.S. Government securities,
(b) the entity receives a dividend-paid
deduction comparable to Section 561 of the
Internal Revenue Code, or is exempt from
entity level tax,
(c) the entity is required to distribute at
least eighty-five percent (85%) of its
taxable income, as computed in the
jurisdiction in which it is organized, to
the holders of its shares or certificates of
beneficial interest on an annual basis,
(d) not more than ten percent (10%) of the
voting power or value in such entity is held
directly or indirectly or constructively by
a single entity or individual, or the shares
or beneficial interests of such entity are
regularly traded on an established
securities market, and

HB1200 HFLR Page 65
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(e) the entity is organized in a country which
has a tax treaty with the United States.
3. For purposes of this subsection, the constructive ownership
rules of Section 318(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by
Section 856(d)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall apply in
determining the ownership of stock, assets, or net profits of any
person.
4. A real estate investment trust that does not become
regularly traded on an established securities market within one (1)
year of the date on which it first becomes a real estate investment
trust shall be deemed not to have been regularly traded on an
established securities market, retroactive to the date it first
became a real estate investment trust, and shall file an amended
return reflecting such retroactive designation for any tax year or
part year occurring during its initial year of status as a real
estate investment trust. For purposes of this subsection, a real
estate investment trust becomes a real estate investment trust on
the first day it has both met the requirements of Section 856 of the
Internal Revenue Code and has elected to be treated as a real estate
investment trust pursuant to Section 856(c)(1) of the Internal
Revenue Code.



HB1200 HFLR Page 66
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
02/27/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.





















HB1200 HFLR Page 67
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.